Missouri, session 2026, SB1794.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 197.315 and 198.022, RSMo, are
repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 197.315, 198.022, and 198.043, to read as
follows:
197.315. 1. Any person who proposes to develop or
offer a new institutional health service within the state
must obtain a certificate of need from the committee prior
to the time such services are offered.
2. Only those new institutional health services which
are found by the committee to be needed shall be granted a
certificate of need. Only those new institutional health
services which are granted certificates of need shall be
offered or developed within the state. No expenditures for
new institutional health services in excess of the
applicable expenditure minimum shall be made by any person
unless a certificate of need has been granted.
3. After October 1, 1980, no state agency charged by
statute to license or certify health care facilities shall
issue a license to or certify any such facility, or distinct
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1794 2
part of such facility, that is developed without obtaining a
certificate of need.
4. If any person proposes to develop any new
institutional health care service without a certificate of
need as required by sections 197.300 to 197.366, the
committee shall notify the attorney general, and he shall
apply for an injunction or other appropriate legal action in
any court of this state against that person.
5. After October 1, 1980, no agency of state
government may appropriate or grant funds to or make payment
of any funds to any person or health care facility which has
not first obtained every certificate of need required
pursuant to sections 197.300 to 197.366.
6. A certificate of need shall be issued only for the
premises and persons named in the application and is not
transferable except by consent of the committee.
7. Project cost increases, due to changes in the
project application as approved or due to project change
orders, exceeding the initial estimate by more than ten
percent shall not be incurred without consent of the
committee.
8. Periodic reports to the committee shall be required
of any applicant who has been granted a certificate of need
until the project has been completed. The committee may
order the forfeiture of the certificate of need upon failure
of the applicant to file any such report.
9. A certificate of need shall be subject to
forfeiture for failure to incur a capital expenditure on any
approved project within six months after the date of the
order. The applicant may request an extension from the
committee of not more than six additional months based upon
substantial expenditure made.

SB 1794 3
10. Each application for a certificate of need must be
accompanied by an application fee. The time of filing
commences with the receipt of the application and the
application fee. The application fee is one thousand
dollars, or one-tenth of one percent of the total cost of
the proposed project, whichever is greater. All application
fees shall be deposited in the state treasury. Because of
the loss of federal funds, the general assembly will
appropriate funds to the Missouri health facilities review
committee.
11. In determining whether a certificate of need
should be granted, no consideration shall be given to the
facilities or equipment of any other health care facility
located more than a fifteen-mile radius from the applying
facility.
12. When a nursing facility shifts from a skilled to
an intermediate level of nursing care, it may return to the
higher level of care if it meets the licensure requirements,
without obtaining a certificate of need.
13. In no event shall a certificate of need be denied
because the applicant refuses to provide abortion services
or information.
14. A certificate of need shall not be required for
the transfer of ownership of an existing and operational
health facility in its entirety, except for any assisted
living facility, intermediate care facility, residential
care facility, or skilled nursing facility, as such terms
are defined in section 198.006.
15. A certificate of need may be granted to a facility
for an expansion, an addition of services, a new
institutional service, or for a new hospital facility which

SB 1794 4
provides for something less than that which was sought in
the application.
16. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
facilities operated by the state, and appropriation of funds
to such facilities by the general assembly shall be deemed
in compliance with this section, and such facilities shall
be deemed to have received an appropriate certificate of
need without payment of any fee or charge. The provisions
of this subsection shall not apply to hospitals operated by
the state and licensed under this chapter, except for
department of mental health state-operated psychiatric
hospitals.
17. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section,
a certificate of need may be issued after July 1, 1983, for
an intermediate care facility operated exclusively for the
intellectually disabled.
18. To assure the safe, appropriate, and cost-
effective transfer of new medical technology throughout the
state, a certificate of need shall not be required for the
purchase and operation of:
(1) Research equipment that is to be used in a
100 clinical trial that has received written approval from a
101 duly constituted institutional review board of an accredited
102 school of medicine or osteopathy located in Missouri to
103 establish its safety and efficacy and does not increase the
104 bed complement of the institution in which the equipment is
105 to be located. After the clinical trial has been completed,
106 a certificate of need must be obtained for continued use in
107 such facility; or
108 (2) Equipment that is to be used by an academic health
109 center operated by the state in furtherance of its research
110 or teaching missions.

SB 1794 5
198.022. 1. Upon receipt of an application for a
license to operate a facility, the department shall review
the application, investigate the applicant and the
statements sworn to in the application for license and
conduct any necessary inspections. A license shall be
issued if the following requirements are met:
(1) The application discloses all facility owners,
facility trustees, and companies that provide the facility
or operator with administrative, clinical, and financial
services, including real estate investment trusts;
(2) The statements in the application are true and
correct;
[(2)] (3) The facility and the operator are in
substantial compliance with the provisions of sections
198.003 to 198.096 and the standards established thereunder;
[(3)] (4) The applicant has the financial capacity to
operate the facility;
[(4)] (5) The administrator of an assisted living
facility, a skilled nursing facility, or an intermediate
care facility is currently licensed under the provisions of
chapter 344;
[(5)] (6) Neither the operator nor any principals in
the operation of the facility have ever been convicted of a
felony offense concerning the operation of a long-term
health care facility or other health care facility or ever
knowingly acted or knowingly failed to perform any duty
which materially and adversely affected the health, safety,
welfare or property of a resident, while acting in a
management capacity. The operator of the facility or any
principal in the operation of the facility shall not be
under exclusion from participation in the Title XVIII

SB 1794 6
(Medicare) or Title XIX (Medicaid) program of any state or
territory;
[(6)] (7) Neither the operator nor any principals
involved in the operation of the facility have ever been
convicted of a felony in any state or federal court arising
out of conduct involving either management of a long-term
care facility or the provision or receipt of health care; and
[(7)] (8) All fees due to the state have been paid.
2. Upon denial of any application for a license, the
department shall so notify the applicant in writing, setting
forth therein the reasons and grounds for denial.
3. The department may inspect any facility and any
records and may make copies of records, at the facility, at
the department's own expense, required to be maintained by
sections 198.003 to 198.096 or by the rules and regulations
promulgated thereunder at any time if a license has been
issued to or an application for a license has been filed by
the operator of such facility. Copies of any records
requested by the department shall be prepared by the staff
of such facility within two business days or as determined
by the department. The department shall not remove or
disassemble any medical record during any inspection of the
facility, but may observe the photocopying or may make its
own copies if the facility does not have the technology to
make the copies. In accordance with the provisions of
section 198.525, the department shall make at least one
inspection per year, which shall be unannounced to the
operator. The department may make such other inspections,
announced or unannounced, as it deems necessary to carry out
the provisions of sections 198.003 to 198.136.
4. Whenever the department has reasonable grounds to
believe that a facility required to be licensed under

SB 1794 7
sections 198.003 to 198.096 is operating without a license,
and the department is not permitted access to inspect the
facility, or when a licensed operator refuses to permit
access to the department to inspect the facility, the
department shall apply to the circuit court of the county in
which the premises is located for an order authorizing entry
for such inspection, and the court shall issue the order if
it finds reasonable grounds for inspection or if it finds
that a licensed operator has refused to permit the
department access to inspect the facility.
5. Whenever the department is inspecting a facility in
response to an application from an operator located outside
of Missouri not previously licensed by the department, the
department may request from the applicant the past five
years compliance history of all facilities owned by the
applicant located outside of this state.
198.043. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Certified nursing assistant", the same meaning
given to the term in section 198.082;
(2) "Charge nurse", a registered professional nurse
who oversees the operations of the nurse's specific nursing
unit during a set period;
(3) "CMS", the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services;
(4) "Hours per resident day", the total number of
hours worked by each type of staff divided by the total
number of residents;
(5) "Registered professional nurse" or "registered
nurse", the same meanings given to the terms in section
335.016.

SB 1794 8
2. Assisted living facilities shall have sufficient
nursing staff with the appropriate competencies and skill
sets to provide nursing and related services to ensure
resident safety and attain or maintain the highest
practicable physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being of
each resident by maintaining on a twenty-four-hour basis the
following types of personnel:
(1) Registered nurses. Each assisted living facility
shall comply with the following staffing requirements for
registered nurses:
(a) Each assisted living facility shall provide care
by registered nurses for a minimum of fifty-five hundredths
hours per resident day; and
(b) At least one registered nurse shall be on site
twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week; and
(2) Other nursing personnel. Each assisted living
facility shall provide care by certified nursing assistants
for a minimum of two and forty-four hundredths hours per
resident day.
3. Assisted living facilities shall electronically
submit to CMS complete and accurate direct care staffing
information, including information for agency and contract
staff, based on payroll and other verifiable and auditable
data in a uniform format according to specifications
established by CMS in accordance with 42 CFR 483.70(p).
4. Determinations of compliance with hours per
resident day specified in subsection 2 of this section shall
be made by the department based on the most recent available
quarter of Payroll-Based Journal System data maintained by
CMS.
5. The department may impose appropriate sanctions and
assess an administrative penalty under this section on an

SB 1794 9
administrator of a facility who fails to meet the minimum
staffing standards two quarters in a row as determined by
rule.
6. (1) An assisted living facility may be exempted
from the minimum staffing requirements of subdivisions (1)
and (2) of subsection 2 of this section by the department if
a verifiable hardship exists that prohibits the facility
from achieving or maintaining compliance as demonstrated by
meeting the following criteria:
(a) The facility is located in an area where:
a. The supply of applicable health care staff, either
registered professional nurses or certified nursing
assistants or both, is not sufficient to meet area needs as
evidenced by a provider-population ratio for nursing
workforce that is medium, twenty percent below the national
average, or low, forty percent below the national average;
and
b. The facility is at least twenty miles from another
assisted living facility;
(b) The facility demonstrates that it has been unable,
despite diligent efforts, including offering at least
prevailing wages, to recruit and retain appropriate
personnel as verified by:
a. Job listings in commonly used recruitment forums
found online at American Job Centers, coordinated by the
U.S. Department of Labor's Employment and Training
Administration; MoJobs, coordinated by the department of
higher education and workforce development; and other forums
as appropriate;
b. Documented job vacancies, including the number and
duration of the vacancies and documentation of offers made,
including that they were made at least at prevailing wages;

SB 1794 10
c. Data on the average wages in the metropolitan
statistical area in which the facility is located and
vacancies by industry as reported by the department of labor
and industrial relations; and
d. The facility's staffing plan, which shall be
developed and maintained to maximize recruitment and
retention of direct care staff; and
(c) The facility demonstrates through documentation
the amount of financial resources that the facility expends
on nurse staffing relative to revenue.
(2) A facility shall not be eligible for a hardship
waiver from the minimum staffing requirements if the
facility:
(a) Has been cited within the twelve months preceding
the survey during which the facility's noncompliance is
identified:
a. For having widespread insufficient staffing with
resultant resident actual harm;
b. For a pattern of insufficient staffing with
resultant resident actual harm; or
100 c. As at the immediate jeopardy level of severity with
101 respect to insufficient staffing as determined by CMS; or
102 (b) Has failed to submit data to CMS under subsection
103 3 of this section.
104 7. In order to appropriately manage required nursing
105 staff, an assisted living facility shall:
106 (1) Designate a registered professional nurse as the
107 director of nursing on a full-time basis; and
108 (2) Designate a registered professional nurse to serve
109 as a charge nurse for each nursing shift. The director of
110 nursing designated in subdivision (1) of this subsection may

SB 1794 11
111 serve as a charge nurse only if the facility has an average
112 daily occupancy of sixty or fewer residents.
✓